District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2602.16

Exemption from District taxes or fees.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 4, 1922, 42 Stat. 409, ch. 93, title 5, § 16
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(b), 50 DCR 330

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1416.
1973 Ed., § 35-1116.

Editor's Notes

United States Shipping Board abolished: By Executive Order No. 6166, § 12, dated June 10, 1933, the United States Shipping Board was abolished and its functions, including those over and in respect to the United States Shipping Board Merchant Fleet Corporation, were transferred to the Department of Commerce. By §§ 201 and 204 of the Act of June 29, 1936, 49 Stat. 1987, ch. 858, the United States Maritime Commission was created and the functions of the former United States Shipping Board, including those vested in the Department of Commerce by Executive Order No. 6166, were transferred thereto. The functions of the United States Maritime Commission were transferred to the Federal Maritime Board by Part I of Reorganization Plan No. 21 of 1950, 64 Stat. 1273. The functions of the Federal Maritime Board were transferred to the Federal Maritime Commission by § 103 of Reorganization Plan No. 7 of 1961, 75 Stat. 840.